Utah statutes.
76-10-1215.   Prosecution by county, district, or city attorney -- Fines payable to county or city.

Prosecution for violation of any section of this part, including a felony violation, shall be brought by the county attorney or, if within a prosecution district, the district attorney of the county where the violation occurs.  If the violation occurs, however, in a city of the first or second class, prosecution may be brought by either the county, district, or city attorney, notwithstanding any provision of law limiting the powers of city attorneys.  All fines imposed for the violation of this part shall be paid to the county or city of the prosecuting attorney, as the case may be.

